Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2326.03
Clerk of the district court; depositories; designation.

Depositories shall be such banks, capital stock financial institutions, and qualifying mutual financial institutions as shall be from time to time designated by the county board by formal resolution duly recorded in the minutes of the proceedings of such board. Such designation may be withdrawn at any time by such board in like manner, whereupon all deposits in such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution under the control of the clerk of the district court shall be immediately withdrawn. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1947, c. 269, § 3, p. 869;

Laws 1988, LB 370, § 14;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 45;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 45.